inc/flattened/phonology-only-syncope-rules.xfscript
!these handle contemptive/diminutive allomorphy
!define lenPreNas [ e1 -> e || _ nastrig];
define lenPreNas [e1 -> e || _  nastrig,,
                    [..] -> o || \o o _ nastrig ,,
                    [..] -> i || \i i _ nastrig ,,
                    [..] -> a || \a a _ nastrig ];

define Ei [e1 -> i];

!devoicing, final lowering is written by non-Rhodes spelling (i->e not standard)
define devoice [b -> p, d -> t, g -> k || _ .#.];
define finlowo  [o  ->  a || _ .#.];  ! SNM: had to split the rule in two - it
define finlowi  [i (->) e || _ .#.];  ! is not possible to combine -> and (->) in the same rule the way it was.

define str1 [ [..] -> %& || vowel _ vowel, vowel vowel _, e _ ];
define str2 [ [..] -> %& || shortv _ (codaseqs) [%-|.#.] ];
define str3 [ [..] -> %& // shortv cseqs shortv _ ];

define ambigsync [vowel -> %' || !syncope in ortho ambig contexts
                                \[.#.|%-] n _  [z|g|h|s|y], !material preceding n reflects a permitted ambiguity
                                                            !for derived nh, ' not always used (mzinhigan perhaps preceding V must be long?)
                                [s|z] _  [h]
                                ];

define clustsync [vowel -> %' || !crazy version (marking all prim/sec ambig clusts)
                                n _  [d|z h|z|j|g|h|s|y],
                                m _  [b],
                                [s|z] _  [h],
                                [s (h)] _  [p|t|k],
                                cons-[w|y|w1|w2|w3|w4|y1|%'|h] _  w
                                ];

define rsync [vowel -> 0 || _ \%& ]; 

define codawdel [w (->) 0 || _ cons ]; !w variably deletes in coda Medler
                                        !alternatively: the deleting w (VAI 3 suff) is irregularly present

define cleanse [ [%>|%^|%<|%&|%*] -> 0 ]; !> = suff bound, < pre bound, ^ v-init dep stem marker, & stress marker, *extended prefix boundary
define rmStressMarker [ %& -> 0 ] ;

! read lexc /Users/arppe/giellatekno/langs/otw/src/morphology/lexicon.tmp.lexc
! define Morphology ;

read regex [ ! Morphology.l .o.
!     rmvalent    .o. !valentine special char killer
!    preGli      .o.
    optinitV    .o. !allows post syncope n-nokii < n[d]-ankii < nidanokii. Comment out for syncope/non-syncope
!    preDel      .o.
!    preLen      .o.
!    preEpen     .o. 
!    conPl       .o.
!    a1toshort   .o.
!    a1toe       .o.
!    a1tolong    .o.
!    i1tolong    .o.
!    ordAssim    .o.
!    NC          .o.
!    cnjD1Gnasstem .o.
!    partexcise  .o.
!    cnjD1p      .o.
!    cnjpb1      .o.
!    cnjnegsig   .o.
!    cnjd1w4     .o.
!    cnjoban     .o.
!    cnjW3w      .o.
!    cnjW3del    .o.
!    cnjrmbound  .o.
!    cnjaepen    .o.
!    w5o         .o.
!    w5del       .o.
!    w5w         .o.
!    ccEpen      .o.
    rmBound     .o. !rules at or above this line reference morpheme boundaries
!    ccnjexcrspec .o.
!    ccnjlong    .o.
!    ccnjshort   .o.
!    ccnjexcr    .o.
!    rmccnj      .o.
!    cnjHiatus   .o.
!    cnjVoi      .o.
!    d2k         .o.
!    d2del       .o.
!    d2d         .o.
!    cnjRmC1     .o.
!    cnjD1Gnas   .o.
!    d1pal       .o.
!    cnjD1d      .o.
!    cnjW4nas    .o. !Medler didn't have this rule
!    cnjW4w      .o.
!    cnjw4Del    .o.
!    cnjb1b      .o.
!    vtiVoi      .o.
!    complen     .o.
!    m1n         .o.
!    n4n         .o.
!    m1m         .o.
!    w2nas       .o.
!    w2def       .o.
!    Spal        .o.
!    Salv        .o.
!    Npal        .o.
!    i2def     .o.
!    Nalv        .o.
!    ny          .o.
!    vvvDel      .o.
!    y1Coal      .o.
!    w1Coal      .o.
!    w1Coal2     .o. ! only Odawa
!    w1Faith     .o. ! other dialects
!    w1Del       .o.
!    wiCoal      .o. !Might should include this rule (Medler, might be more general)
!    vCoal       .o.
!    lenPreNas   .o.
!    Ei          .o.
!    apocope     .o.
!    glidedel    .o.
!    n2del       .o.
!    n2def       .o.
    str1        .o.
    str2        .o.
    str3        .o.
    ambigsync   .o. !comment out for non-syncopated
    rsync       .o. !comment out for non-syncopated
    codawdel    .o. !Medler, probably more general
!    cleanse    .o. ! Morpheme-boundaries to be retained 
    rmStressMarker
]; 
